Massachusetts, session 194th, S2975.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
The General Laws are hereby amended by inserting after chapter 221 the following 
chapter:- 
Chapter 221A. 
Section 1.  The following terms, as used in this chapter, shall have the following 
meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise: 
"Civil arrest", an arrest that is not: (i) for the sole or primary purpose of preparing the 
person subject to such arrest for criminal prosecution, for an alleged violation of the criminal law 

of 6 8 of: (A) the commonwealth or another jurisdiction within the United States, for which a sentence 
of a term of imprisonment is authorized by law; or (B) the United States, for which a sentence of 
a term of imprisonment is authorized by law, and for which federal law requires an initial 
appearance before a federal judge, federal magistrate or other judicial officer, pursuant to the 
federal rules of criminal procedure that govern initial appearances; or (ii) for contempt of the 
court in which the court proceeding is taking place or will be taking place. 
"Courthouse", the interior of any facility or property in which a court of the 
commonwealth conducts business. 
"Courthouse grounds", the courthouse and any garage or parking lot owned by the 
judicial branch or under contract with or control of said branch, for the purpose of serving a 
courthouse, any walkways or sidewalks on the grounds of, contiguous to or abutting the grounds 
of the courthouse or connecting such garage or parking lot to the courthouse or grounds of the 
courthouse.  
"Court proceeding", shall include, but not be limited to, an appearance in a court of the 
commonwealth before a judge or justice or judicial magistrate of the commonwealth ordered or 
scheduled by such judge or justice or judicial magistrate, or the filing of papers concerning such 
appearance before a judge or justice or judicial magistrate of the commonwealth. 
"Family or household member",  persons:  (i) related by consanguinity or affinity;  (ii)  
legally married to one another;  (iii)  formerly married to one another regardless of whether they 
still reside in the same household;  (iv)  who have a child in common regardless of whether such 
persons are married or have lived together at any time; (v)  unrelated who are continually or at 
regular intervals living in the same household or who have in the past continually or at regular 

of 6 30 intervals lived in the same household;  or (vi) who are not related by consanguinity or affinity 
and who are or have been in an intimate relationship regardless of whether such persons have 
lived together at any time; provided, however, that “intimate relationship” shall be determined by 
considering factors, including but not limited to,  the nature or type of relationship, regardless of 
whether the relationship is sexual in nature; the frequency of interaction between the persons; 
and the duration of the relationship; and provided further, that neither a casual acquaintance nor 
ordinary fraternization between 2 individuals in business or social contexts shall be deemed to 
constitute an intimate relationship for purposes of this section. 
"Judicial warrant or judicial order authorizing such civil arrest", an arrest warrant or other 
judicial order, issued by a magistrate sitting in the judicial branch of a local or state government 
or of the federal government, authorizing a civil arrest and issued by the court in which 
proceedings following such arrest will be heard and determined. 
Section 2. (a) Subject to the superintendence authority of the supreme judicial court to 
administer justice and writs of protection, a person who is duly attending a court proceeding in 
which such person is a party or potential witness, or a family or household member is a party or 
potential witness, shall not be subject to civil arrest while present at the courthouse or courthouse 
grounds in connection with a court proceeding or while traveling to and returning from, the 
location of such court proceedings, unless such civil arrest is supported by a judicial warrant or 
judicial order authorizing such civil arrest. 
(b)  A representative of a local, state or federal law enforcement agency who, while 
acting in an official capacity, enters a courthouse, as defined in section 1, intending to observe an 
individual or take an individual into custody shall self-identify to uniformed court personnel and 

of 6 52 state the specific law enforcement purpose for the representative’s presence in the courthouse 
and the proposed enforcement action the representative intends to take while in the courthouse or 
on courthouse grounds; provided however, that information on any such proposed enforcement 
action shall be transmitted to and reviewed by designated court system personnel, who may 
include, but shall not be limited to, the judge presiding over any case involving the subject of 
that enforcement action; provided further that if such representative has a judicial warrant or 
judicial order authorizing such civil arrest, such representative shall provide a copy of such 
warrant or order to court personnel and such warrant or order shall be promptly reviewed by a 
judge or court clerk in accordance with policies and procedures of the applicable court.  Except 
in extraordinary circumstances, no arrest may be made by a representative of a law enforcement 
agency in a courtroom during procedures, absent leave of the court. 
(c) The prohibitions on law enforcement actions under subsection (b) shall not apply if 
the individual intended to be the subject of the enforcement action has been convicted of murder 
in the first degree under section 1 of chapter 265, a violation of sections 22, 22A, 22B, 22C, 22D, 
23, 23A, 23B, 50 or 51 of said chapter 265 or is identified as a match in the United States 
Federal Bureau of Investigations terrorist Threat Screening Center. 
(d) A party, witness, staff, employee, or representative of a local, state, or federal law 
enforcement agency shall not wear a mask or other face covering in the courthouse unless 
required by a medical, chemical, or biological emergency.  
(e) Copies of all warrants and orders authorizing arrest and provided to court personnel 
pursuant to this section shall be maintained by the Chief Justice of the Supreme Judicial Court. 
Annually, the Supreme Judicial Court shall prepare, publish on the court’s website and provide 

of 6 74 to the governor, the president of the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives, the chairs 
of the joint committee on the judiciary, a report containing information on the warrants and 
judicial orders received by each local and state court of the commonwealth pursuant to this 
section in the past calendar year, including, but not limited to, the date each judicial warrant or 
judicial order was signed, the judge who issued such judicial warrant or judicial order and the 
name and location of the court that issued the warrant or order, as shown by such warrant or 
order, the date the judicial warrant or judicial order was presented to counsel, a description of the 
type of judicial warrant or judicial order and, if known, whether or not an arrest occurred with 
respect to such warrant and the date and specific location of such arrest. 
(f) Subject to the superintendence authority of the Supreme Judicial Court as provided in 
section 3 of chapter 211, the Supreme Judicial Court may issue rules and notices to implement 
this act. 
Section 3.  (a) The attorney general shall enforce this chapter, including but not limited 
to, through a suit in equity in the superior court.  An arrest or detention in violation of this 
section shall constitute false imprisonment; provided, however, that nothing in this section shall 
affect any right or defense available to a person, police officer, peace officer, or public officer, or 
any court system personnel acting lawfully, in accordance with duties outlined in section 70A of 
chapter 221. 
(b) The attorney general may bring a civil action in the name of the people of the 
commonwealth to obtain appropriate equitable and declaratory relief if the attorney general has 
reasonable cause to believe that a violation of this section, as described in this section, has 
occurred or will occur. 

of 6 96  (c) In an action pursuant to this section, the court shall award reasonable attorney's fees 
and costs to the prevailing party. 
(d) This section shall be construed as an exercise of authority of the commonwealth over 
the administration and integrity of its judicial branch operations and proceedings. Nothing in this 
100 section shall be construed to narrow or abrogate rights or privileges against civil arrest that exist 
101 under the common law.    
102  (e) No action may be commenced pursuant to this section against the judicial branch or 
103 any officer or employee of the judicial branch acting lawfully and in good faith, pursuant to such 
104 officer's or employee's official duties and in accordance with this chapter and other applicable 
105 laws and regulations.